apertium-ga-gd.gd.dix
    <pardef n="nearta/ich__vblex">
      <e><p><l>ichte</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichte</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichte</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichte</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>chadh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>chaidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ich</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ich</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ich</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ich</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ich</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ich</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>icheadh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>icheadh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>icheadh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>icheadh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ich</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ich</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ich</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ich</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ich</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ich</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ich</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>icheadh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>icheadh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>icheadh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>icheadh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>icheamaid</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichinn</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichibh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ich</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="br/eac__n">
      <e><p><l>eac</l><r>eac<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ic</l><r>eac<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ic</l><r>eac<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ic</l><r>eac<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="tinne/as-mara__n">
      <e><p><l>as-mara</l><r>as-mara<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>is-mara</l><r>as-mara<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="treòra/ich__vblex">
      <e><p><l>ichte</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichte</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichte</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichte</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>chadh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>chaidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ich</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichibh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ich</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="oba/nn__adj">
      <e><p><l>nn</l><r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inne</l><r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inn</l><r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nn</l><r>nn<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="taigh/-staile__n">
      <e><p><l>-staile</l><r>-staile<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e-staile</l><r>-staile<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ean-staile</l><r>-staile<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ean-staile</l><r>-staile<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="s/eòl-mara__n">
      <e><p><l>eòl-mara</l><r>eòl-mara<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iùil-mara</l><r>eòl-mara<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iùil-mhara</l><r>eòl-mara<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iùil-mhara</l><r>eòl-mara<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     

    <e lm="breac"><par n="initial-b"/><i>r</i><par n="br/eac__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lethbhreac"><par n="initial-l"/><i>ethbhr</i><par n="br/eac__n"/></e>
    <e lm="seòl-mara"><par n="initial-s"/><i></i><par n="s/eòl-mara__n"/></e>
    <e lm="taigh-staile"><par n="initial-t"/><i>aigh</i><par n="taigh/-staile__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tinneas-mara"><par n="initial-t"/><i>inne</i><par n="tinne/as-mara__n"/></e>
    <e lm="neo-ionann"><i>neo-iona</i><par n="oba/nn__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="anfhann"><i>anfha</i><par n="oba/nn__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lachdann"><i>lachda</i><par n="oba/nn__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="obann"><i>oba</i><par n="oba/nn__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="neartaich"><i>nearta</i><par n="nearta/ich__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="treòraich"><i>treòra</i><par n="treòra/ich__vblex"/></e>
